Florida, session 2026, SB98.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 20 21 Section 1.âSubsection (1) of section 83.803, Florida 22 Statutes, is amended to read: 23 83.803âDefinitions.âAs used in ss. 83.801-83.809: 24 (1)ââLast known addressâ means the street address or post 25 office box address provided by the tenant in the latest rental 26 agreement or, subject to any requirement in the rental 27 agreement, in a subsequent written change-of-address notice 28 provided by hand delivery, first-class mail, or e-mail. 29 Section 2.âSubsections (1) and (4) of section 83.806, 30 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 31 83.806âEnforcement of lien.âAn ownerâs lien as provided in 32 s. 83.805 may be satisfied as follows: 33 (1)âThe owner must notify the tenant and any alternate 34 contact tenant shall be notified by written notice delivered in 35 person, by e-mail, or by first-class mail with a certificate of 36 mailing to the tenantâs and, if applicable, the alternate 37 contactâs last known address and conspicuously posted at the 38 self-service storage facility or on the self-contained storage 39 unit. If the owner sends notice of a pending sale of property to 40 the tenantâs last known e-mail address and does not receive a 41 response, return receipt, or delivery confirmation from the same 42 e-mail address, the owner must send notice of the sale to the 43 tenant by first-class mail with a certificate of mailing to the 44 tenantâs last known address before proceeding with the sale. 45 (4)âAfter the expiration of the time given in the notice, 46 an advertisement of the sale or other disposition must shall be 47 published once a week for 2 consecutive weeks in a newspaper of 48 general circulation in the area where the self-service storage 49 facility or self-contained storage unit is located or on a 50 public website that customarily conducts or advertises personal 51 property auctions or sales. 52 (a)âA lien sale may be conducted on a public website that 53 customarily conducts personal property auctions or sales. The 54 facility or unit owner is not required to hold a license to post 55 property for online sale. Inasmuch As any sale may involve 56 property of more than one tenant, a single advertisement may be 57 used to dispose of property at any one sale. 58 (b)âThe advertisement must shall include: 59 1.âA brief and general description of what is believed to 60 constitute the personal property contained in the storage unit, 61 as provided in paragraph (2)(b). 62 2.âThe address of the self-service storage facility or the 63 address where the self-contained storage unit is located and the 64 name of the tenant. 65 3.âThe time, place, and manner of the sale or other 66 disposition. The sale or other disposition must shall take place 67 at least 15 days after the first publication. 68 (c)âIf there is no newspaper of general circulation in the 69 area where the self-service storage facility or self-contained 70 storage unit is located, the advertisement must shall be posted 71 at least 10 days before the date of the sale or other 72 disposition in at least three conspicuous places in the 73 neighborhood where the self-service storage facility or self 74 contained storage unit is located. 75 Section 3.âSubsection (4) is added to section 83.808, 76 Florida Statutes, to read: 77 83.808âContracts.â 78 (4)âRental agreements entered into on or after October 1, 79 2026, must contain a provision that apprises the tenant of the 80 option to designate an alternate contact to receive notices 81 required by the Self-storage Facility Act and must provide space 82 in the agreement to designate the alternate contact. 83 (a)âFailure or refusal of a tenant to designate an 84 alternate contact does not affect a tenantâs or an ownerâs 85 rights or remedies under this section or under any other law. 86 The alternate contact, if any, may not have any rights to access 87 the tenantâs storage space at a self-service storage facility or 88 the tenantâs self-contained storage unit or the personal 89 property contained therein unless expressly stated otherwise in 90 the rental agreement. 91 (b)âFor rental agreements entered into before October 1, 92 2026, an owner may send notice to the tenantâs last known 93 address to apprise the tenant of his or her right to designate 94 an alternate contact by the method specified by the owner in the 95 notice. 96 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.